Maryland, session 2025, SB0591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–1701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Anaerobic digestion” means the controlled anaerobic biological decomposition
of organic waste material to produce biogas and digestate.
(b–1) (1) “Architectural paint” means interior and exterior architectural coatings
sold in containers of 5 gallons or less.
(2) “Architectural paint” does not include industrial coatings, original
equipment coatings, or specialty coatings.
(B–2) (1) “AUTHORIZED COLLECTOR” MEANS AN ENTITY THAT IS
AUTHORIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO ACCEPT OR COLLECT ALL MAKES AND
MODELS OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES TO BE RECYCLED, REFURBISHED, OR
REUSED.
(2) “AUTHORIZED COLLECTOR” INCLUDES:
(I) LOCAL GOVERNMENTS;
(II) NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS;
(III) ELECTRONICS RETAILERS;
(IV) A PERSON AUTHORIZED BY A COUNTY, MUNICIPALITY, OR
DISTRICT TO COLLECT COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES UNDER THE TERMS OF A
CONTRACT, LICENSE, PERMIT, OR OTHER WRITTEN AUTHORIZATION; AND

SENATE BILL 591 3
(V) A MANUFACTURER THAT IS AN ELECTRONICS RETAILER:
1. WITH THEIR OWN PHYSICAL COVERED ELECTRONIC
DEVICE TAKEBACK LOCATION IN THE STATE; AND
2. THAT ACCEPTS AND COLLECTS ALL MAKES AND
MODELS OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES FROM THE PUBLIC AT NO COST.
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
“AUTHORIZED COLLECTOR” DOES NOT INCLUDE A MANUFACTURER.
(B–3) (1) “AUTHORIZED RECYCLER” MEANS:
(I) A PERSON THAT:
1. ENGAGES IN THE MANUAL OR MECHANICAL
REFURBISHMENT OR SEPARATION OF ALL MAKES AND MODELS OF COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICES IN ORDER TO RECOVER:
A. THE ENTIRE DEVICE FOR THE PURPOSE OF REUSE; OR
B. COMPONENTS OR COMMODITIES FROM THE DEVICES
FOR THE PURPOSE OF RECYCLING; OR
2. A. CHANGES THE PHYSICAL OR CHEMICAL
COMPOSITION OF A COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE BY DECONSTRUCTING,
REDUCING IN SIZE, CRUSHING, CUTTING, SAWING, COMPACTING, SHREDDING, OR
REFINING IN ORDER TO SEGREGATE COMPONENTS FOR THE PURPOSE OF
RECYCLING THE COMPONENTS; AND
B. ARRANGES FOR THE TRANSPORT OF SEGREGATED
COMPONENTS TO AN END USER; OR
(II) AN ELECTRONICS RETAILER THAT IS AUTHORIZED BY THE
DEPARTMENT TO COLLECT, REFURBISH, REUSE, OR RECYCLE A COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE
RECYCLING PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1728.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) “AUTHORIZED RECYCLER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
MANUFACTURER.
(c) “Compost” means the product of composting in accordance with the standards
established by the Secretary of Agriculture under § 6–221 of the Agriculture Article.

SENATE BILL 591
(d) “Composting” means the controlled aerobic biological decomposition of organic
waste material in accordance with the standards established by the Secretary under this
title.
(e) (1) “Composting facility” means a facility where composting takes place.
(2) “Composting facility” does not include a facility that is required to
obtain:
(i) A natural wood waste recycling facility permit in accordance with
this title;
(ii) A sewage sludge utilization permit in accordance with this title;
or
(iii) A refuse disposal permit in accordance with this title.
(f) (1) “Computer” means a desktop personal computer or laptop computer,
including the computer monitor.
(2) “Computer” does not include:
(i) A personal digital assistant device; or
(ii) A computer peripheral device, including:
1. A mouse or other similar pointing device;
2. A printer; or
3. A detachable keyboard.
(g) (1) “Covered electronic device” means a [computer or video display] TIER
I OR A TIER II COVERED ELECTRONIC device [with a screen that is greater than 4 inches
measured diagonally] OR OTHER TIER OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE IF
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN REGULATION.
(2) “Covered electronic device” does not include a video display OR OTHER
ELECTRONIC device that is part of a motor vehicle or that is contained within a household
appliance, INCLUDING WHITE GOODS, or commercial, industrial, or medical equipment.
(h) [“Covered electronic device takeback program” means a program, established
by a covered electronic device manufacturer or a group of covered electronic device
manufacturers, for the collection and recycling, refurbishing, or reuse of a covered
electronic device labeled with the name of the manufacturer or the manufacturer’s brand
label, including:

SENATE BILL 591 5
(1) Providing, at no cost to the returner, a method of returning a covered
electronic device to the manufacturer, including postage paid mailing packages or
designated collection points throughout the State;
(2) Contracting with a recycler, local government, other manufacturer, or
any other person; or
(3) Any other program approved by the Department.
(i)] “Director” means the Director of the Office of Recycling.
[(i–1)] (I) “Distributor” means a company that has a contractual relationship with
one or more producers to market and sell architectural paint to retailers in the State.
(I–1) “ELECTRONICS RETAILER” MEANS ANY PERSON THAT SELLS A
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE DIRECTLY TO A CONSUMER.
(i–2) “Food residuals” means material derived from the processing or discarding of
food, including pre– and post–consumer vegetables, fruits, grains, dairy products, and
meats.
(j) “Manufacturer” means a person that is the brand owner of a covered electronic
device sold or offered for sale in the State, by any means, including transactions conducted
through sales outlets, catalogs, or the Internet.
(k) (1) “Natural wood waste” means tree and other natural vegetative refuse.
(2) “Natural wood waste” includes tree stumps, brush and limbs, root mats,
logs, and other natural vegetative material.
(l) (1) “Natural wood waste recycling facility” means a facility where recycling
services for natural wood waste are provided.
(2) “Natural wood waste recycling facility” does not include a collection or
processing facility operated by:
(i) A nonprofit or governmental organization located in the State; or
(ii) A single individual or business that provides recycling services
for its own employees or for its own recyclable materials generated on its own premises.
(m) “Office” means the Office of Recycling within the Department.
(n) (1) “Organics recycling” means any process in which organic materials or
compostable packaging materials are collected, separated, or processed and returned to the
marketplace in the form of raw materials or products.

SENATE BILL 591
(2) “Organics recycling” includes anaerobic digestion and composting.
(o) “Organics recycling facility” means a facility where organics recycling takes
place.
(o–1) “Paint stewardship assessment” means the amount added to the purchase
price of architectural paint sold in the State that is necessary to cover the Paint
Stewardship Program’s cost of collecting, transporting, and processing postconsumer paint
statewide.
(o–2) “Postconsumer paint” means architectural paint not used and no longer
wanted by a purchaser.
(o–3) “Producer” means a manufacturer of architectural paint that sells, offers for
sale, or distributes the paint in the State under the producer’s own name or brand.
(p) (1) “Recyclable materials” means those materials that:
(i) Would otherwise become solid waste for disposal in a refuse
disposal system; and
(ii) May be collected, separated, composted, or processed and
returned to the marketplace in the form of raw materials or products.
(2) “Recyclable materials” does not include incinerator ash.
(q) “Recycling” means any process in which recyclable materials are collected,
separated, or processed and returned to the marketplace in the form of raw materials or
products.
(r) “Recycling services” means the services provided by persons engaged in the
business of recycling, including the collection, processing, storage, purchase, sale, or
disposition of recyclable materials.
(r–1) “Refuse disposal system” has the meaning stated in § 9–201 of this title.
(r–2) “Representative organization” means a nonprofit organization created by
producers to implement a Paint Stewardship Program.
(r–3) “Retailer” means any person that offers architectural paint for sale at retail
in the State.
(r–4) “Sale” or “sell” means any transfer of title for consideration, including remote
sales conducted through sales outlets, catalogues, the Internet, or any other similar
electronic means.

SENATE BILL 591 7
(s) (1) “Solid waste stream” means garbage or refuse that would, unless
recycled, be disposed of in a refuse disposal system.
(2) “Solid waste stream” includes organic material capable of being
composted that is not composted in accordance with regulations adopted under § 9–1725(b)
of this subtitle.
(3) “Solid waste stream” does not include:
(i) Hospital waste;
(ii) Rubble;
(iii) Scrap material;
(iv) Land clearing debris;
(v) Sewage sludge; or
(vi) Waste generated by a single individual or business and disposed
of in a facility dedicated solely for that entity’s waste.
(T) “TIER I COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE” MEANS A COMPUTER MONITOR,
TELEVISION, OR VIDEO DISPLAY DEVICE THAT IS NOT OTHERWISE SPECIFIED AS A
TIER II COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE.
(U) “TIER II COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE” MEANS:
(1) A LAPTOP COMPUTER;
(2) A PERSONAL DIGITAL ASSISTANT, NOTEBOOK, READER, OR
TABLET DEVICE;
(3) A CELL PHONE;
(4) A CENTRAL PROCESSING UNIT OF A COMPUTER;
(5) A PRINTER;
(6) A SCANNER;
(7) A FACSIMILE MACHINE;
(8) A COPIER; AND

SENATE BILL 591
(9) ANY OTHER COMPUTER OR ELECTRONIC DEVICE OR ACCESSORY
THAT HAS A PLUG OR BATTERY THAT IS DESIGNATED AS A TIER II COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICE BY THE DEPARTMENT.
[(t)] (V) (1) “Video display device” means an electronic device with an output
surface that displays or is capable of displaying moving graphical images or visual
representations of image sequences or pictures that show a number of quickly changing
images on a screen to create the illusion of motion.
(2) “Video display device” includes a device that is an integral part of the
display and cannot easily be removed from the display by the consumer and that produces
the moving image on the screen.
(3) A video display device may use a cathode–ray tube (CRT), liquid crystal
display (LCD), gas plasma, digital light processing, or other image–projection technology.
[(u)] (W) “White goods” includes:
(1) Refrigerators;
(2) Stoves;
(3) Washing machines;
(4) Dryers;
(5) Water heaters; [and]
(6) Air conditioners; AND
(7) ANY OTHER APPLIANCES DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN
REGULATION.
[(v)] (X) (1) “Yard waste” means organic plant waste derived from gardening,
landscaping, and tree trimming activities.
(2) “Yard waste” includes leaves, garden waste, lawn cuttings, weeds, and
prunings.
9–1707.
(f) (1) There is a State Recycling Trust Fund.
(2) The Fund shall consist of:
(i) The newsprint recycling incentive fee;

SENATE BILL 591 9
(ii) The telephone directory recycling incentive fee collected under §
9–1709 of this subtitle;
(iii) [The covered electronic device manufacturer registration fee
collected under § 9–1728 of this subtitle;
(iv)] The Paint Stewardship Program plan and annual report review
fees collected under § 9–1733(b) and (h) of this subtitle;
[(v)] (IV) All fines and penalties collected under this subtitle;
[(vi)] (V) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
[(vii)] (VI) Any other money from any other source accepted for the
benefit of the Fund.
(3) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(4) The Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.
(5) At the end of each fiscal year, any unspent or unencumbered balance in
the Fund that exceeds $2,000,000 shall revert to the General Fund of the State in
accordance with § 7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(6) In accordance with the State budget, the Fund shall be used only:
(i) To provide grants to the counties to be used by the counties to
develop and implement local recycling plans;
(ii) [To provide grants to counties that have addressed methods for
the separate collection and recycling of covered electronic devices in accordance with §
9–1703(c)(1) of this subtitle;
(iii) To provide grants to municipalities to be used by the
municipalities to implement local covered electronic device recycling programs;
(iv)] To cover the costs of the Paint Stewardship Program plan review
under § 9–1733(b) of this subtitle, the annual report review under § 9–1733(h) of this
subtitle, and associated costs for Program compliance oversight; [and]
(III) IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, TO MAKE A DISBURSEMENT TO AN AUTHORIZED COLLECTOR OR AN
AUTHORIZED RECYCLER IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1728.3(G) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND

SENATE BILL 591
[(v)] (IV) To carry out the purposes of the land management
administration.
(7) (I) 1. THERE SHALL BE A SEPARATE COVERED ELECTRONIC
DEVICE RECYCLING ACCOUNT WITHIN THE FUND.
2. THE ACCOUNT SHALL CONSIST OF ANY FEES
COLLECTED FROM ELECTRONICS RETAILERS UNDER § 9–1728.3(E) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
3. THE ACCOUNT SHALL BE USED ONLY TO MAKE A
DISBURSEMENT TO AN AUTHORIZED RECYCLER OR AN AUTHORIZED COLLECTOR IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1728.3(G) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) 1. THERE SHALL BE A SEPARATE COVERED ELECTRONIC
DEVICE MANUFACTURER REGISTRATION FEE ACCOUNT WITHIN THE FUND.
2. THE ACCOUNT SHALL CONSIST OF THE COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER REGISTRATION FEE COLLECTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1728(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
3. THE ACCOUNT SHALL BE USED TO:
A. FUND THE COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE
RECYCLING PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1728.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
B. REIMBURSE EXPENSES OF MEMBERS OF THE
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE ADVISORY COUNCIL UNDER § 9–1728.4 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
[(7)] (8) (i) The Treasurer shall invest the money in the Fund in the
same manner as other State money may be invested.
(ii) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the
General Fund of the State.
9–1727.
(a) This section applies to a manufacturer that sells or offers for sale a new
covered electronic device in the State.
(b) A manufacturer may not sell or offer for sale to any person in the State a new
covered electronic device unless:

SENATE BILL 591 11
(1) The covered electronic device is labeled with the name of the
manufacturer or the manufacturer’s brand label; and
(2) The manufacturer has registered with and[, if applicable,] submitted a
registration fee to the Department as provided under this part.
9–1728.
(a) A covered electronic device manufacturer’s registration shall include:
(1) The brand names under which the manufacturer sells or offers for sale
covered electronic devices in the State;
(2) [Whether the manufacturer has implemented a covered electronic
device takeback program;
(3) If the manufacturer has implemented a covered electronic device
takeback program:
(i)] A toll–free number or Web site address that provides
[information about the takeback program, including] a detailed description of how a person
may return a covered electronic device for recycling, refurbishing, or reuse; [and]
[(ii) One year after the implementation of the program and each year
thereafter, a report on the implementation of the program during the prior year, including:
1. The total weight of the covered electronic devices received
by the program from Maryland during the prior year;
2. The total number of covered electronic devices from
Maryland recycled, refurbished, and reused during the prior year; and
3. The processes and methods used to recycle, refurbish, or
reuse the covered electronic devices received from Maryland;]
[(4)] (3) The total number of covered electronic devices sold in the State
in the prior year, including:
(i) The types of covered electronic devices sold; and
(ii) The brand names under which the covered electronic devices
were sold; and
[(5)] (4) Any additional information required by the Department in
regulation.

SENATE BILL 591
(b) The registration shall[:
(1) Be] BE submitted to the Department by March 1 of each year[; and
(2) If the manufacturer has implemented a covered electronic device
takeback program, be updated prior to any significant change in the program].
(c) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
covered electronic device manufacturer registration fee shall be paid by a manufacturer in
accordance with this subsection.
(2) [For the initial registration by a manufacturer, the] THE registration
fee is:
(i) $10,000 for a manufacturer that sold at least 1,000 covered
electronic devices in the State in the prior year; and
(ii) $5,000 for a manufacturer that sold at least 100 but not more
than 999 covered electronic devices in the State in the prior year.
[(3) For each subsequent annual registration by a manufacturer that did
not have an implemented covered electronic device takeback program in the prior year, the
registration fee is:
(i) 1. On or after March 1, 2013, and before March 1, 2016,
$10,000 for a manufacturer that sold at least 1,000 covered electronic devices in the State
in the prior year; and
2. On or after March 1, 2016, $5,000 for a manufacturer that
sold at least 1,000 covered electronic devices in the State in the prior year; and
(ii) $5,000 for a manufacturer that sold at least 100 but not more
than 999 covered electronic devices in the State in the prior year.
(4) For each subsequent annual registration by a manufacturer that had
an implemented covered electronic device takeback program in the prior year, the
registration fee is $500.]
[(5)] (3) There is no registration fee for a manufacturer that sold less than
100 covered electronic devices in the State in the prior year.
[(6)] (4) The registration fee required under this subsection shall:
(i) Be submitted to the Department by March 1 of each year; and

SENATE BILL 591 13
(ii) Be paid into the COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURER REGISTRATION FEE ACCOUNT WITHIN THE State Recycling Trust
Fund.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADJUST THE COVERED ELECTRONIC
DEVICE MANUFACTURER REGISTRATION FEE BY REGULATION.
(d) (1) The Department shall:
(i) Review the registration submitted under this section; and
(ii) If the registration does not meet the requirements of this section
and the regulations adopted by the Department under this subtitle, notify the
manufacturer of the insufficiency.
(2) Within 60 days after receipt of a notice of insufficiency, the
manufacturer shall submit a revised registration that addresses the insufficiencies noted
by the Department.
(e) The Department shall maintain a list of registered covered electronic device
manufacturers on its Web site.
(f) The sales data submitted in accordance with subsection [(a)(4)] (A)(3) of this
section shall be treated as confidential and proprietary, and may not be disclosed except as
otherwise required by law.
9–1728.1.
[(a) In this section, “retailer” means any person that sells a covered electronic
device to a consumer.
(b)] If a manufacturer is subject to the requirements of §§ 9–1727 and 9–1728 of
this [part] SUBTITLE, [a] AN ELECTRONICS retailer may not sell or offer for sale to any
person in the State a new covered electronic device manufactured by the manufacturer,
unless the manufacturer has complied with the requirements of §§ 9–1727 and 9–1728 of
this [part] SUBTITLE.
9–1728.2.
[(a)] A manufacturer [that has implemented a covered electronic device takeback
program] shall include educational and instructional materials relating to the destruction
and sanitization of data from a covered electronic device[:
(1) With] WITH each new covered electronic device sold or offered for sale
in the State[;]:

SENATE BILL 591
[(2)] (1) (I) On the manufacturer’s [covered electronic device takeback
program Web site] WEBSITE; or
[(3)] (II) As information provided through [the manufacturer’s covered
electronic device takeback program] A toll–free number; AND
(2) IN MULTIPLE LANGUAGES, AS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, AND FORMATS TO COMPLY WITH THE FEDERAL AMERICANS WITH
DISABILITIES ACT.
[(b) A manufacturer that is participating in a covered electronic device takeback
program established by a group of covered electronic device manufacturers shall be
considered as having implemented a covered electronic device takeback program under this
part.]
9–1728.3.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE COVERED ELECTRONIC
DEVICE RECYCLING PROGRAM.
(B) (1) THERE IS A COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE RECYCLING
PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION, A B CORPORATION, OR ANY OTHER ENTITY THAT SPECIALIZES IN
THE PRIVATE MANAGEMENT OF ELECTRONICS RECYCLING SYSTEMS FOR
GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES TO ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO FACILITATE THE COLLECTION
AND RECYCLING, REFURBISHING, OR REUSE OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES IN
THE STATE.
(D) THE PROGRAM SHALL BE FUNDED BY THE COVERED ELECTRONIC
DEVICE MANUFACTURER REGISTRATION FEE ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED WITHIN THE
STATE RECYCLING TRUST FUND UNDER § 9–1707(F)(7)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) (1) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, A CONSUMER SHALL PAY A RECYCLING
FEE WITH THE PURCHASE OF A NEW COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE IN THE STATE.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
RECYCLING FEE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE

SENATE BILL 591 15
IN AN AMOUNT NECESSARY TO COVER REIMBURSEMENT FOR COSTS UNDER
SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICE ADVISORY COUNCIL ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1728.4 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, MAY BY REGULATION:
1. DETERMINE REASONABLE RECYCLING FEES
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
2. AMEND OR EXPAND:
A. EXISTING TIERS OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES;
AND
B. THE DEFINITION OF “WHITE GOODS” AS DEFINED IN §
9–1701 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
3. ESTABLISH ADDITIONAL TIERS OF COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICES.
(F) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
AND BEGINNING AUGUST 1, 2027, AND EACH MONTH THEREAFTER, AN
ELECTRONICS RETAILER SHALL REMIT THE RECYCLING FEE COLLECTED DURING
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING MONTH TO THE COMPTROLLER.
(2) (I) AN ELECTRONICS RETAILER THAT TIMELY SUBMITS THE
RECYCLING FEE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS ALLOWED, FOR THE EXPENSE OF
ADMINISTERING AND PAYING THE RECYCLING FEE, A CREDIT IN AN AMOUNT NOT
MORE THAN 3% OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF RECYCLING FEES COLLECTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE COMPTROLLER JOINTLY
SHALL DETERMINE THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(3) EACH QUARTER, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DEPOSIT ALL
RECYCLING FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION INTO THE COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICE RECYCLING ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED WITHIN THE STATE
RECYCLING TRUST FUND UNDER § 9–1707(F)(7)(I) OF THIS SUBTITLE, LESS THE
COST OF ADMINISTRATION.

SENATE BILL 591
(G) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, AND EACH MONTH THEREAFTER AND ON
RECEIPT OF ACCURATE AND REASONABLE REIMBURSEMENT REQUESTS AS
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL, WITHIN 45 DAYS
AFTER THE DATE THAT THE REIMBURSEMENT REQUEST IS RECEIVED, DISBURSE
FUNDS FROM THE COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE RECYCLING ACCOUNT WITHIN
THE STATE RECYCLING TRUST FUND TO:
(1) AUTHORIZED RECYCLERS AS REIMBURSEMENT FOR THE COSTS
OF RECYCLING, REFURBISHMENT, OR REUSE OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING COLLECTION AND
TRANSPORTATION SUCH AS THE ADMINISTRATION OF MAILBACK PROGRAMS,
CURBSIDE PICKUP PROGRAMS, AND COLLECTION FROM DROP–OFF SITES, AS
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN REGULATION; AND
(2) AUTHORIZED COLLECTORS AS REIMBURSEMENT FOR THE COSTS
OF STORAGE, ON–SITE COLLECTION, EQUIPMENT, HEAT AND FIRE DETECTION AND
SUPPRESSION AND EXTINGUISHING SYSTEMS AND EQUIPMENT, TRANSPORTATION,
STAFFING, EDUCATION, AND, IF APPLICABLE, THE ADMINISTRATION OF MAILBACK
AND CURBSIDE PICKUP PROGRAMS, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN
REGULATION.
(H) (1) IF AN AUTHORIZED RECYCLER OR AN AUTHORIZED COLLECTOR
RECEIVES REIMBURSEMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS
SECTION, THE AUTHORIZED RECYCLER AND THE AUTHORIZED COLLECTOR:
(I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AND
SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, MAY NOT CHARGE A PERSON A
FEE FOR DELIVERING OR DROPPING OFF A COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE ON–SITE;
AND
(II) SHALL, IF APPLICABLE, CHARGE A COVERED ELECTRONIC
DEVICE MANUFACTURER A FEE FOR DELIVERING OR DROPPING OFF A COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICE ON–SITE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY AUTHORIZE AN AUTHORIZED RECYCLER
OR AUTHORIZED COLLECTOR TO CHARGE A PERSON A FEE FOR DROPPING OFF A
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE IF THE AUTHORIZED RECYCLER OR AUTHORIZED
COLLECTOR SUBMITS A WAIVER JUSTIFYING THE NEED TO CHARGE THE FEE.
9–1728.4.
(A) THERE IS A COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE ADVISORY COUNCIL.

SENATE BILL 591 17
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL IS TO ADVISE THE
DEPARTMENT ON THE IMPLEMENTATION AND THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE RECYCLING PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER §
9–1728.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, OR THE MEMBER’S
DESIGNEE, APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, OR THE MEMBER’S
DESIGNEE, APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(3) THE COMPTROLLER, OR THE COMPTROLLER’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE; AND
(5) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY:
(I) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION
OF COUNTIES;
(II) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND MUNICIPAL
LEAGUE;
(III) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE
RECYCLERS IN THE STATE;
(IV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE
MANUFACTURERS IN THE STATE;
(V) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF ELECTRONICS RETAILERS IN
THE STATE;
(VI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND
ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE;
(VII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE NORTHEAST MARYLAND
WASTE DISPOSAL AUTHORITY;
(VIII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A NONPROFIT ENVIRONMENTAL
ADVOCACY ORGANIZATION THAT HAS EXPERIENCE WITH EXTENDED PRODUCER
RESPONSIBILITY LAWS;

SENATE BILL 591
(IX) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND RECYCLING
NETWORK; AND
(X) ANY OTHER MEMBER AS DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY.
(D) FROM AMONG THE ADVISORY COUNCIL MEMBERS, THE SECRETARY
SHALL DESIGNATE TWO MEMBERS TO SERVE AS COCHAIRS OF THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
ADVISORY COUNCIL; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES:
(I) UNDER THE STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS
PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET; AND
(II) FROM THE COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER
REGISTRATION FEE ACCOUNT IN THE STATE RECYCLING TRUST FUND.
(G) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL MEET AT THE REQUEST OF THE
SECRETARY.
(H) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL STUDY AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS
REGARDING:
(1) CHANGES TO THE DEFINITION OF “COVERED ELECTRONIC
DEVICE”;
(2) THE AMOUNT OF:
(I) RECYCLING FEES COLLECTED BY ELECTRONICS RETAILERS
EACH YEAR TO ENSURE COSTS BORNE BY AUTHORIZED COLLECTORS AND
AUTHORIZED RECYCLERS ARE COVERED; AND
(II) COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE MANUFACTURER
REGISTRATION FEES COLLECTED EACH YEAR TO ENSURE ADEQUATE FUNDING FOR

SENATE BILL 591 19
THE DEPARTMENT’S ADMINISTRATION OF THE COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE
RECYCLING PROGRAM;
(3) REASONABLE CAPS ON:
(I) COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE RECYCLING PAYMENTS;
AND
(II) COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE RECOVERY FEE PAYMENTS;
(4) STANDARDS TO BE USED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN DEVELOPING
APPLICATION MATERIALS AND PROCEDURES FOR AUTHORIZED COLLECTORS AND
AUTHORIZED RECYCLERS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1729(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(5) THE CONVENIENCE AND AVAILABILITY OF DROP–OFF SITES FOR
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES IN THE STATE, INCLUDING AN EVALUATION OF THE
FEASIBILITY AND COSTS OF INCREASING PUBLIC ACCESS TO DROP–OFF SITES,
MAILBACK PROGRAMS, AND CURBSIDE PICKUP FOR PURPOSES OF DEVELOPING
ADOPTION AND CONVENIENCE TARGETS FOR EACH METHOD;
(6) THE REUSE, REFURBISHMENT, AND RECYCLABILITY OF COVERED
ELECTRONIC DEVICES AND OTHER ELECTRONIC DEVICES UNDER CONSIDERATION
TO BE COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICES; AND
(7) ANY OTHER RELATED TOPICS IF REQUESTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(I) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON OR
BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, AND EACH DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL SHALL REPORT ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) (I) RECOMMENDATIONS SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO BE CONSENSUS RECOMMENDATIONS.
(II) IF MULTIPLE RECOMMENDATIONS ARE SUBMITTED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION, EACH RECOMMENDATION SHALL INDICATE EACH MEMBER IN
FAVOR OF THE RECOMMENDATION.
9–1729.
(A) The Department may adopt regulations necessary to implement AND
ADMINISTER the provisions of this subtitle[, including the required components of a
covered electronic device takeback program].

SENATE BILL 591
(B) REGULATIONS ADOPTED TO IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE
COVERED ELECTRONIC DEVICE RECYCLING PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
9–1728.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL ESTABLISH APPLICATION MATERIALS AND
PROCEDURES FOR AUTHORIZED COLLECTORS AND AUTHORIZED RECYCLERS.
9–1730.
(a) The provisions and penalties of § 9–342 of this title shall be used and shall
apply to enforce violations of this part.
(b) (1) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, the Department may
assess against any ELECTRONICS retailer that violates [§ 9–1728.1(b)] § 9–1728.1 of this
[part] SUBTITLE a fine up to $1,000 for each violation, but not exceeding $10,000 total.
(2) A fine under paragraph (1) of this subsection may be assessed only after
the ELECTRONICS retailer that committed the violation has been issued three warnings
regarding the violation.
(3) Each day on which a violation occurs or continues is a separate violation
under this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2025, the Department of the Environment shall notify manufacturers of covered electronic
devices of the Covered Electronic Device Recycling Program as enacted by Section 1 of this
Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.